District of Columbia statutes.
1-631.07

Transfer of official personnel folders.

The system for the maintenance of the official personnel folder established under § 1-631.01 shall provide for the transfer of folders between agencies of the District government subject to this chapter when employees transfer from 1 agency to another.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3107, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-632.7.
1973 Ed., § 1-361.7.